Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8002.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-27.3-100.1.5 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-27.3 entitled
"State Building Code" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-27.3-100.1.5. Building code — Adoption and promulgation by committee.
(a) The state building code standards committee has the authority to adopt, promulgate,
and administer a state building code, which shall include:
(1) Provisions and amendments as necessary to resolve conflicts between fire safety codes
and building codes, as provided for in § 23-28.01-6; and
(2) A rehabilitation building and fire code for existing buildings and structures.
(b) The building code may be promulgated in several sections, with a section applicable
to: (1) One-, two (2)-, three (3)-, and four (4)-family dwellings using the International Residential
Code from the International Code Council (“ICC”) and any amendments thereto adopted by the
state building code standards committee; (2) To multiple dwellings with more than four (4)
residential units, and hotels and motels and other commercial structures using the Commercial
International Building Code from the ICC and any amendments thereto adopted by the state
building code standards committee; and (3) To general building construction; to plumbing; and to
electrical.
(c) The building code shall incorporate minimum standards for the location, design,
construction, and installation of wells that are appurtenances to a building in applicable sections.
For purposes of this chapter, “appurtenance” includes the installation, alteration, or repair of wells

connected to a structure consistent with chapter 13.2 of title 46.
(d) The building code and the sections thereof shall be reasonably consistent with
recognized and accepted standards adopted by national model code organizations and recognized
authorities. To the extent that any state or local building codes, statutes, or ordinances are
inconsistent with the Americans with Disabilities Act, Title III, Public Accommodations and
Services Operated by Private Entities, 42 U.S.C. § 12181 et seq., and its regulations and standards,
they are hereby repealed. The state building code standards committee is hereby directed to adopt
rules and regulations consistent with the Americans with Disabilities Act, Titles II and III (28
C.F.R. Part 35 and 28 C.F.R. Part 36, as amended), as soon as possible, but no later than February
15, 2012, to take effect on or before March 15, 2012. The state building code standards committee
is hereby authorized and directed to update those rules and regulations consistent with the future
revisions of the Americans with Disabilities Act Accessibility Standards.
(e) Notwithstanding any provisions of the building code to the contrary, the building code
shall allow for the construction of residential buildings up to four (4) stories and sixteen (16)
dwelling units, with a single staircase; provided that, any applicable provisions and requirements
of chapter 28.01 of title 23 (comprehensive fire safety act) and chapter 28.1 of the title 23 (fire
safety code--general provisions) and associated regulations incorporated or adopted thereunder
shall govern the design and construction of the same unless otherwise waived or varied by the
appropriate state agency.
(e)(f) All electrical work done in the state shall be in accordance with the latest edition of
the National Electrical Code (NEC). The state building code standards committee shall adopt the
latest edition of the NEC, including any amendments to the NEC by the committee. The adoption
of the NEC by the commission shall be completed so that it will take effect on the first day of July
of the year the edition is dated.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005911
========
LC005911 - Page 2 of 3